Hawaii statutes.
[§163D-14] Trustee; designation, duties.
(a) The corporation shall designate a trustee for each issue of revenue bonds
secured under the same trust indenture.

(b) The trustee shall be authorized by the
corporation to hold and administer the project facility revenue bond special
fund established pursuant to section [163D-13], to receive and receipt for,
hold, and administer the revenues derived by the corporation from the project
facility for which the revenue bonds were issued, and to apply these revenues
to the payment of the cost:

(1) Of undertaking the project facility;

(2) Of administering and operating the proceedings
providing for the issuance of the revenue bonds;

(3) To pay the principal or interest on these bonds;

(4) To the establishment of reserves; and

(5) To other purposes as may be authorized in the
proceedings providing for the issuance of the revenue bonds.

(c) Notwithstanding section 39-68 to the
contrary, the director of finance may appoint the trustee to serve as fiscal
agent for:

(1) The payment of the principal of and interest on
the revenue bonds; and

(2) The purchase, registration, transfer, exchange,
and redemption of the bonds.

(d) The trustee shall perform additional
functions with respect to the payment, purchase, registration, transfer,
exchange, and redemption of the bonds, as the director of finance may deem
necessary, advisable, or expeditious, including the holding of the revenue
bonds and coupons that have been paid and the supervision of the destruction
thereof in accordance with applicable law.

(e) Nothing in this chapter shall limit or be
construed to limit the powers granted to the director of finance in sections
36-3, 39-13, and 39-68(a), to appoint the trustee or others as fiscal agents,
paying agents, and registrars for the revenue bonds or to authorize and empower
those fiscal agents, paying agents, and registrars to perform the functions
referred to in those sections. [L 1994, c 264, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next